Hawaii statutes.
[§431R-1] Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context indicates otherwise:

"Beneficiary of a prescription drug
benefit plan" or "beneficiary" means a person who is a member,
subscriber, enrollee, or dependent of a member, subscriber, or enrollee of or
otherwise covered under a prescription drug benefit plan.

"Pharmacy benefit manager" means any
person, business, or entity that performs pharmacy benefit management,
including but not limited to a person or entity under contract with a pharmacy
benefit manager to perform pharmacy benefit management on behalf of a managed
care company, nonprofit hospital or medical service organization, insurance
company, third-party payor, or health program administered by the State.

"Pharmacy benefit manager's retail
pharmacy network" means a retail pharmacy located and licensed in the
State and contracted by the pharmacy benefit manager to sell prescription drugs
to beneficiaries of a prescription drug benefit plan administered by the
manager.

"Prescription drug benefit plan"
means an accident and sickness insurance plan or health benefits plan that
includes coverage for prescription drugs. For the purposes of this definition,
a "health benefits plan" has the same meaning as in section 87A-1.

"Prescription drug benefit plan
provider" means a person who provides prescription drug coverage as part
of an accident and health or sickness insurance contract or other type of
health insurance or benefits plan that is offered by the person and is subject
to regulation under article 10A of chapter 431, chapter 432, or chapter 432D.

"Retail community pharmacy" means a
pharmacy, permitted by the board of pharmacy pursuant to section 461-14, that
is open to the public, dispenses prescription drugs to the general public, and
makes available face-to-face consultations between licensed pharmacists and the
general public to whom prescription drugs are dispensed. [L 2013, c 226, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next